Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.194.010

Education programs for juveniles in adult jails.

A program of education shall be made available for juvenile inmates by adult jail facilities and the several school districts of the state for persons under the age of eighteen years who have been incarcerated in any adult jail facilities operated under the authority of chapter 70.48 RCW. Each school district within which there is located an adult jail facility shall, singly or in concert with another school district pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 or chapter 39.34 RCW, conduct a program of education, including related student activities for inmates in adult jail facilities. School districts are not precluded from contracting with educational service districts, community and technical colleges, four-year institutions of higher education, or other qualified entities to provide all or part of these education programs. The division of duties, authority, and liabilities of the adult jail facilities and the several school districts of the state respecting the educational programs shall be as provided for in this chapter with regard to programs for juveniles in adult jail facilities.

[ 2010 c 226 s 2.]